Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-150
Correctional Industries
Revolving Fund; created; use; investment.

All funds
received by the Department of Correctional Services under sections 83-144
to 83-152 shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Correctional
Industries Revolving Fund, which fund is hereby created. The fund shall be
administered by the Director of Correctional Services. The fund (1) shall be used to pay all
proper expenses incident to the administration of sections 83-144 to 83-152 and (2) may be used to carry out section
83-186.01, except that transfers from the fund to the General
Fund may be made at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Correctional
Industries Revolving Fund available for investment shall be invested by the
state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and
the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1935, c. 183, § 9, p. 681;

Laws 1939, c. 135, § 1, p. 580;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 83-964;

R.S.1943, § 83-150;

Laws 1959, c. 442, § 5, p. 1487;

Laws 1969, c. 820, § 2, p. 3126;

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 111, p. 2417;

Laws 1973, LB 563, § 33;

Laws 1992, Third Spec. Sess., LB 2, § 2;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 129;

Laws 2013, LB483, § 2.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.